Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1845
Real property taxes; treasurer's tax deed; taxes paid; mistake in entry; effect.

In all cases when a person has paid his or her taxes and through mistake in the entry made in the treasurer's books or in the receipt the real property upon which the taxes were paid was afterwards sold, the treasurer's deed shall not convey the title.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 221, p. 471;

R.S.1913, § 6549;

C.S.1922, § 6077;

C.S.1929, § 77-2029;

R.S.1943, § 77-1845;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 163;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 136.

A deed erroneously issued after redemption has occurred is void. Mack v. Luebben, 215 Neb. 832, 341 N.W.2d 335 (1983).